Florida, session 2026, SB1400.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 323.003, Florida Statutes, is created to 19 read: 20 323.003âTowing disabled vehicles; notification.â 21 (1)âWhen a motor vehicle is disabled due to a motor vehicle 22 crash and a wrecker operator is needed to tow the vehicle: 23 (a)âIf law enforcement is impounding the vehicle, a law 24 enforcement officer must provide the driver with a list of 25 wrecker operators the driver may choose from; or 26 (b)âThe driver may call a wrecker operator of his or her 27 choice. 28 (2)âThe law enforcement officer and the wrecker operator 29 shall inform the driver of the vehicle storage charge per day, 30 the telephone number and e-mail address of the wrecker operator 31 storage facility to which the vehicle is being towed, and the 32 process for the owner to retrieve the vehicle. 33 (3)âThe wrecker operator storage facility shall notify the 34 owner of the vehicle in writing by certified mail and by 35 telephone and text message 14 business days, 30 business days, 36 and 45 business days after the vehicle arrives at the facility 37 stating that the vehicle is in storage and accruing daily 38 storage charges. 39 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.